Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF435.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2076YH (2) 91 jm/jh H.F. 435 Section 1. Section 422.7, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 45. a. Subtract the gross rent paid at 3 armâs length by a taxpayer, for the right of occupancy of a 4 homestead or manufactured or mobile home, including the rent 5 for land occupied by the manufactured or mobile home not to 6 exceed one acre. 7 b. As used in this subsection, âhomesteadâ means a dwelling 8 in this state rented and actually used as the primary home by 9 the taxpayer including part of a multidwelling. 10 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to tax years 11 beginning on or after January 1, 2026. 12